Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2661.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1302(a) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, amended July 17, 2024 (P.L.810, No.67), is amended to read:Section 1302. Residence and Right to Free School Privileges.--(a) (1) A child shall be considered a resident of the school district in which his parents or the guardian of his person resides. Federal installations are considered a part of the school district or districts in which they are situate and the children residing on such installations shall be counted as resident pupils of the school district.1234567891011121314151617181920 (2) The parent or guardian of a student enrolled in a school district shall use the form developed under paragraph (3) to submit continued proof of the student's residence to the student's school district of residence by March 1 of each school year. The following apply to the form and its submittal:(i) The form of a newly enrolled student shall satisfy the March 1 requirement for the current school year.(ii) A student identified as homeless under 42 U.S.C. § 11302 (relating to general definition of homeless individual) shall not be required to submit the information required under the form.(3) The department shall develop a school district residency verification form, which may be electronic, for use under paragraph (2). The form shall only include:(i) The current school year.(ii) The name, home address and mailing address of the student.(iii) Parent or guardian information, including:(A) The name, home address, mailing address, telephone number and email address of the student's parents or guardians, as applicable.(B) A field to indicate who the student primarily resides with, including "Both Parents or Guardians," "Both Parents or Guardians Alternately," "Parent or Guardian #1 Only (Primary Parent or Guardian)," "Foster Parent," "Other Adult" and "Unaccompanied Youth."(iv) The student's school district of residence.(v) Proof of residency, which shall be a document containing the parent's or guardian's name and address, on any of the following:20260HB2661PN3696 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) An active residential lease agreement, mortgage statement or deed.(B) A bank statement no more than three (3) months old or a utility or Internet bill no more than three (3) months old.(C) A tax bill or pay stub no more than three (3) months old.(D) An insurance document, hospital bill or doctor bill no more than three (3) months old.(E) A valid vehicle registration.(F) A valid driver's license or Department of Transportation identification card.(G) A piece of mail sent by the Federal or State Government, including benefits information, voter registration or tax documents.(H) A credit card bill no more than three (3) months old.(I) Any other document determined acceptable by the school district's chief administrator.(vi) The signature of the parent or guardian attesting to the accuracy of the information disclosed in the form and the date that the verification form is submitted.(vii) The signature of an authorized representative of the school district attesting to the completion of the form and verification of the proof of residency.* * *Section 2. Section 1748-A of the act, amended July 11, 2024 (P.L.618, No.55) and November 12, 2025 (P.L.244, No.47), is amended to read:Section 1748-A. Enrollment and notification.(a) Notice to school district.--(1) (i) Within 10 business days of the enrollment of a 20260HB2661PN3696 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 student to a cyber charter school, the parent or guardian and the cyber charter school shall notify the student's school district of residence of the enrollment through the use of the cyber charter school enrollment notification form under subsection [(b)] (b.1).(ii) A student identified as homeless under 42 U.S.C. § 11302 (relating to general definition of homeless individual) shall not be required to submit the home address information required in subsection (b.1).(iii) The inability to produce the required information in subsection (b.1) shall not delay or prevent a student from enrolling in a cyber charter school.(iv) Within 10 business days of a change in residency of a student enrolled in a cyber charter school, the parent or guardian shall notify the student's current school district of residence and the cyber charter school through the use of the notification form under subsection (b.1).(1.1) The parent or guardian of a student enrolled in a cyber charter school shall [also] use the cyber charter student residency verification form developed under subsection [(b)] (b.2) to submit continued proof of the student's residence to the cyber charter school and the student's school district of residence by [November 1 and by] March 1 of each school year. The cyber charter school enrollment notification form of a newly enrolled cyber charter student shall satisfy the [first November 1 or March 1 notification deadline, whichever is sooner] March 1 requirement for the current school year. A student identified 20260HB2661PN3696 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 as homeless under 42 U.S.C. § 11302 [(relating to general definition of homeless individual) may] shall not be required to submit the [home address] information required under subsection [(b)(1) or (6)] (b.1)(2) and (9).(1.2) Failure by a parent or guardian to submit the annual cyber charter student residency verification form or submit a completed annual cyber charter student residency verification form shall not be grounds for a school district to withhold payments to a cyber charter school under section 1725-A.(1.3) If a school district does not receive a cyber charter student residency verification form by March 1 for a student whose residency in that school district was previously verified, the school district is responsible for verifying the student's current residency and notifying the student's cyber charter school in accordance with paragraph (2)(ii).(2) If a school district determines [at any time] that a student is not a resident of the school district, the following shall apply:(i) Within 10 business days of receipt of the notice under paragraph (1) or (1.1), the school district shall notify the cyber charter school [and the department] that the student is not a resident of the school district. Notification of nonresidence shall include the basis for the determination.(ii) Within 10 business days of notification under subparagraph (i), the cyber charter school shall review the notification of nonresidence and notify the school district [and the department] that the cyber charter 20260HB2661PN3696 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 school agrees with the school district's determination or does not agree with the school district's determination. If the cyber charter school disagrees with the school district's determination, the cyber charter school shall provide proof of residency as the basis of the determination. If the cyber charter school agrees that the student is not a resident of the school district, the cyber charter school shall determine the proper school district of residence for the student and request funds from that school district.(iii) Within 10 business days of receipt of the response under subparagraph (ii), the school district shall notify the cyber charter school that it agrees with the cyber charter school's determination or does not agree with the cyber charter school's determination.(iv) A school district that has notified the cyber charter school that it does not agree with the cyber charter school's determination under subparagraph (iii) shall appeal to the department for a final determination.(v) All decisions of the department regarding the school district of residence of a student shall be subject to review by the Commonwealth Court.(vi) A school district shall continue to make payments to a cyber charter school under section 1725-A during the time in which the school district of residence of a student is in dispute.(vii) If a final determination is made that a student is not a resident of an appealing school district, the cyber charter school shall return all funds provided on behalf of that student during the period for 20260HB2661PN3696 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 which the student is not a resident of the school district to the school district within 30 days.(a.1) Employee report of nonresidency.--Notwithstanding any provision of the act of December 12, 1986 (P.L.1559, No.169), known as the Whistleblower Law, or any other law to the contrary, if an employee of a cyber charter school makes a good faith report that a student does not reside within the school district that has received notice of the student's enrollment under subsection (a), a cyber charter school may not discharge, threaten or otherwise discriminate or retaliate against an employee regarding the employee's compensation, terms, conditions, location or privileges of employment because the employee makes a good faith report under this subsection.[(b) Notification form.--The department shall develop a notification form, which may be electronic, for use under subsection (a). The notification shall include:(1) The name, home address and mailing address of the student.(2) The grade in which the student is being enrolled.(3) The date the student will be enrolled.(4) The name and address of the cyber charter school and the name and telephone number of a contact person able to provide information regarding the cyber charter school.(5) The signature of the parent or guardian and an authorized representative of the cyber charter school.(6) Proof of residency, which shall be a document containing the parent or guardian's name and address, on any of the following:(i) An active residential lease agreement or a mortgage statement no more than three months old.20260HB2661PN3696 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) A bank statement no more than three months old or a utility or Internet bill no more than three months old.(iii) A tax bill no more than three months old.(iv) An insurance document no more than three months old.(v) Any other document determined acceptable by the department.](b.1) Cyber charter school enrollment notification form.--The department shall develop a cyber charter school enrollment notification form, which may be electronic, for use under subsection (a). The form under this subsection shall only include:(1) The current school year. (2) The name, home address and mailing address of the student.(3) The grade in which the student is being enrolled.(4) The date the student will be enrolled.(5) The name and address of the cyber charter school.(6) Parent or guardian information, including:(i) The name, home address, mailing address, telephone number and email address of the student's parents or guardians, as applicable.(ii) A field to indicate who the student primarily resides with, including "Both Parents or Guardians," "Both Parents or Guardians Alternately," "Parent or Guardian #1 Only (Primary Parent or Guardian)," "Foster Parent," "Other Adult" and "Unaccompanied Youth."(7) The student's school district of residence.(8) Former school information, including:20260HB2661PN3696 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) A field to indicate the type of school that the student previously attended, including "School District," "Cyber Charter School," "Brick-and-Mortar Charter School," "Home School" and "Nonpublic or Private School."(ii) The name and address of the student's former school.(iii) Withdrawal date from the former school.(iv) A field to indicate the reason the student was not enrolled in a school before the cyber charter school enrollment, if applicable, including "Entering Kindergarten," "Re-Enrolling Dropout" and "Other."(9) Proof of residency, which shall be a document containing the parent's or guardian's name and address, on any of the following:(i) An active residential lease agreement, mortgage statement or deed.(ii) A bank statement no more than three months old or a utility or Internet bill no more than three months old.(iii) A tax bill or pay stub no more than three months old.(iv) An insurance document, hospital bill or doctor bill no more than three months old.(v) A valid vehicle registration.(vi) A valid driver's license or Department of Transportation identification card.(vii) A piece of mail sent by the Federal or State Government, including benefits information, voter registration or tax documents.(viii) A credit card bill no more than three months 20260HB2661PN3696 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 old.(ix) Any other document determined acceptable by the cyber charter school's chief administrator.(10) The signature of the parent or guardian attesting to the accuracy of the information disclosed in the form and the date that the verification form is submitted.(11) The signature of an authorized representative of the cyber charter school attesting to the completion of the form and verification of the proof of residency.(b.2) Cyber charter student residency verification form.--The department shall develop a cyber charter student residency verification form, which may be electronic, for use under subsection (a). The form under this subsection shall only include:(1) The current school year.( 2) The name, home address and mailing address of the student.(3) Parent or guardian information, including:(i) The name, home address, mailing address, telephone number and email address of the student's parents or guardians, as applicable.(ii) A field to indicate who the student primarily resides with including "Both Parents or Guardians," "Both Parents or Guardians Alternately," "Parent or Guardian #1 Only (Primary Parent or Guardian)," "Foster Parent," "Other Adult" and "Unaccompanied Youth."(4) The student's school district of residence. (5) Proof of residency, which shall be a document containing the parent or guardian's name and address, on any of the following:20260HB2661PN3696 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) An active residential lease agreement, mortgage statement or deed.(ii) A bank statement no more than three months old or a utility or Internet bill no more than three months old.(iii) A tax bill or pay stub no more than three months old.(iv) An insurance document, hospital bill or doctor bill no more than three months old.(v) A valid vehicle registration.(vi) A valid driver's license or Department of Transportation identification card.(vii) A piece of mail sent by the Federal or State Government, including benefits information, voter registration or tax documents.(viii) A credit card bill no more than three months old.(ix) Any other document determined acceptable by the cyber charter school's chief administrator.(6) The signature of the parent or guardian attesting to the accuracy of the information disclosed in the form and the date that the verification form is submitted.(7) The signature of an authorized representative of the cyber charter school attesting to the completion of the form and verification of the proof of residency.(c) Withdrawal.--The cyber charter school and the parent or guardian of a student enrolled in a cyber charter school shall provide written notification to the student's school district of residence within 10 business days following the withdrawal of a student from the cyber charter school.20260HB2661PN3696 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (d) Penalty for falsifying reimbursement reports.--Any school administrator, employee or representative of a school district or cyber charter school who knowingly falsifies information submitted to a school district, cyber charter school or the department under this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor of the third degree.(e) Construction.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to conflict or be inconsistent with section 1302 or 1302.1 or 42 U.S.C. Ch. 119 (relating to homeless assistance).Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2661PN3696 - 12 - 12345678910